Indiana, session 2026, HB1029.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 16-41-18.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 18.2. Alzheimer's Disease and Dementia Education
Sec. 1. (a) The state department shall collaborate with a national
Alzheimer's disease and dementia organization in educating the
public about the following concerning Alzheimer's disease and
dementia:
(1) The signs and symptoms of Alzheimer's disease and
dementia.
(2) Personal risk factors.
(3) Options for diagnosing and treating Alzheimer's disease
and dementia.
(4) Populations with elevated risk for Alzheimer's disease and
dementia.
(b) The state department shall identify additional partners to
collaborate with in educating the public about Alzheimer's disease
and dementia, including any of the following:
(1) Local health departments.
(2) The division of aging.
(3) Employer wellness programs.
(4) Health care providers, including hospitals.
HEA 1029

2
(5) Health insurers.
(6) Nonprofit organizations.
(7) Community organizations.
Sec. 2. The state department shall partner for outreach with a
national Alzheimer's disease and dementia organization that has
an initiative or program to educate and train health care providers
and human services providers on the following current and
accurate scientific and medical information topics concerning
Alzheimer's disease and dementia:
(1) Diagnosis.
(2) Treatment.
(3) Research advances.
(4) Care planning.
Sec. 3. The state department shall publish information described
in section 2 of this chapter on the state department's website.
Sec. 4. The state department may accept grants, services, and
property from the federal government, public entities, and private
entities to provide the education described in this chapter. The
state department may seek any federal waiver needed to maximize
federal funds to educate the public about Alzheimer's disease and
dementia.
HEA 1029

Speaker of the House of Representatives
President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
HEA 1029